Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.725

Records as evidence.

Any copy of a criminal history record, photograph, fingerprint, or other paper or document in the files of the section, certified by the chief or his or her designee to be a true and complete copy of the original or of information on file with the section, shall be admissible in evidence in any court of this state pursuant to the provisions of RCW 5.44.040.

[ 2006 c 294 s 4; 1985 c 201 s 11; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 6.]